Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB686.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 237 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 6 of this Act:
(1) "Firearm" has the same meaning as in KRS 237.060;
(2) "Firearm suppressor" means any device designed, made, or adapted to muffle the
report of a firearm;
(3) "Generic and insignificant part" means an item that has manufacturing or
consumer product applications other than inclusion in a firearm, and includes a
spring, screw, nut, and pin; and
(4) "Manufacture" includes forging, casting, machining, or other process for
working a material.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 237 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For purposes of Sections 1 to 6 of this Act, a firearm suppressor shall be
considered manufactured in this Commonwealth:
(a) If it is manufactured in this Commonwealth from basic materials and
without the inclusion of any part imported from another state, other than a
generic and insignificant part; and
(b) Without regard to whether a firearm imported into this Commonwealth
from another state is attached to or used in conjunction with the firearm
suppressor.
(2) A firearm suppressor that is manufactured in this Commonwealth and remains in
this Commonwealth shall not be subject to federal law or federal regulation,
including registration, under the authority of the United States Congress to
regulate interstate commerce.
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1782
(3) A basic material from which a firearm suppressor is manufactured in this
Commonwealth, including unmachined steel, is not a firearm suppressor and
shall not be subject to federal regulation under the authority of the United States
Congress to regulate interstate commerce as if it actually were a firearm
suppressor.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 237 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A firearm suppressor manufactured and sold in this Commonwealth shall be clearly
stamped with the words "Made in Kentucky."
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 237 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A United States citizen who resides in this Commonwealth and intends to
manufacture a firearm suppressor to which Section 2 of this Act applies may
provide written notification to the Office of the Attorney General of his or her
intent to do so.
(2) The written notification under subsection (1) of this section shall set forth the
following:
(a) The person's intent to manufacture a firearm suppressor to which Section 2
of this Act applies;
(b) A brief explanation of how and when the person will manufacture the
firearm suppressor;
(c) The person's intent to not follow the procedures and requirements under the
National Firearms Act, 26 U.S.C. sec. 5801 et seq.; and
(d) A declaration that but for the penalty provided in 26 U.S.C. sec. 5871, the
person would manufacture the firearm suppressor without following the
procedures and requirements under the National Firearms Act.
(3) Upon receipt of a written notification under this section, the Attorney General
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1782
shall seek a declaratory judgment from a United States District Court in this
Commonwealth that Section 2 of this Act is consistent with the United States
Constitution.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 237 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) This section shall apply to:
(a) The Commonwealth and its political subdivisions, including a special
district, local or regional public or quasi-public agency, board, commission,
department, public corporation, and state institution of higher education;
(b) Any person acting under the authority of any of the entities in paragraph
(a) of this subsection; and
(c) Commonwealth's and county attorneys.
(2) An entity described in subsection (1) of this section shall not adopt a rule, order,
ordinance, administrative regulation, or policy under which the entity enforces,
or by consistent action allows the enforcement of, a federal statute, order, rule, or
regulation that purports to regulate a firearm suppressor if the statute, order,
rule, or regulation imposes a prohibition, restriction, or other regulation that
does not exist under the laws of this Commonwealth.
(3) An entity that violates this section shall not receive state grant funds. State grant
funds for the entity shall be denied for the fiscal year in which a final judicial
determination in an action brought under Section 6 of this Act is made that the
entity has violated this section.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 237 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If a citizen under the jurisdiction of an entity described in Section 5 of this Act
has reason to believe that a violation of Section 5 of this Act may have occurred,
he or she may refer evidence of noncompliance to the Office of the Attorney
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1782
General which shall investigate the evidence for violations of Section 5 of this
Act.
(2) The Office of the Attorney General may file a petition for a writ of mandamus or
apply for other appropriate equitable relief in the Circuit Court of the county in
which the principal office of the entity is located, or the Circuit Court of the
county in which the citizen resides, to compel the entity's compliance with Section
5 of this Act.
(3) The Attorney General may recover reasonable expenses incurred obtaining relief
under this section, including court costs, reasonable attorney's fees, investigative
costs, witness fees, and deposition costs.
(4) Any party to a suit brought under this section shall have the right of expedited
appeal to the Court of Appeals, and that court shall give precedence to the appeal
over other pending matters.
Section 7. This Act applies to firearm suppressors that are manufactured on or
after the effective date of this Act.
Section 8. This Act may be cited as the Second Amendment Restoration Act.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:00 PM Jacketed